Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-9,110
Public postsecondary educational institution; athletic grant-in-aid; prohibited acts.

No public postsecondary educational institution in the State of Nebraska shall, prior to graduation, reduce, cancel, or refuse to renew an athletic grant-in-aid to a student during his or her period of eligibility to compete in intercollegiate athletics solely because of an injury which prevents the student from participating in athletics.

Laws 1984, LB 764, § 1.